Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Part 2. Receipts Not Normally Apportioned

§ 3354.
Principal receipts.

A trustee shall allocate to principal:

to the extent not allocated to income under this chapter, assets received from a transferor during the transferor’s lifetime, a decedent’s estate, a trust with a terminating income interest, or a payer under a contract naming the trust or its trustee as beneficiary;

money or other property received from the sale, exchange, liquidation, or change in form of a principal asset, including realized profit, subject to this chapter;

amounts recovered from third parties to reimburse the trust because of disbursements described in subdivision 3372(a)(7) of this title or for other reasons to the extent not based on the loss of income;

proceeds of property taken by eminent domain, but a separate award made for the loss of income with respect to an accounting period during which a current income beneficiary had a mandatory income interest is income;

net income received in an accounting period during which there is no beneficiary to whom a trustee may or must distribute income; and

other receipts as provided in sections 3358-3365 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Eminent domain awards.

Even though the award in an eminent domain proceeding may include an amount for the loss of future rent on a lease, if that amount is not separately stated the entire award is principal.
The rule is the same in the 1931 and 1962 Acts.

§ 3355.
Rental property.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from rental property pursuant to this section, the trustee shall allocate to income an amount received as rent of real or personal property, including an amount received for cancellation or renewal of a lease. An amount received as a refundable deposit, including a security deposit or a deposit applied as rent for future periods, must be added to principal and held subject to the terms of the lease and is not available for distribution to a beneficiary until the trustee’s contractual obligations have been satisfied with respect to that amount.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Application of section 3353.

This section applies to the extent that the trustee does not account separately under section 3353 for the management of rental properties owned by the trust.

Receipts that are capital in nature.

A portion of the payment under a lease may be a reimbursement of principal expenditures for improvements to the leased property that is characterized as rent for purposes of invoking contractual or statutory remedies for nonpayment.
If the trustee is accounting for rental income under section 3355, a transfer from income to reimburse principal may be appropriate under section 3371 to the extent that some of the “rent” is really a reimbursement for improvements.
This set of facts could also be a relevant factor for a trustee to consider under subsection 3324(b) in deciding whether and to what extent to make an adjustment between principal and income under subsection 3324(a) after considering the return from the portfolio as a whole.

§ 3356.
Obligation to pay money.

An amount received as interest, whether determined at a fixed, variable, or floating rate, on a bond or an obligation to pay money to the fiduciary shall be allocated to income.

Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, a fiduciary shall allocate to principal any gain or loss realized upon the sale or maturity of any bond or obligation to pay money to the fiduciary, regardless of how such bond or other obligation was acquired.

A fiduciary shall allocate to income the difference between inventory value or cost and the amount realized upon sale or maturity, if greater, for bonds or other obligations that do not bear interest, regardless of how or when such bond or other obligation was acquired.

For bonds or other obligations that are acquired by a fiduciary subsequent to the time the principal was established and whose cost is greater than their par or maturity value, the fiduciary shall amortize periodically out of income the premium paid and, upon sale or maturity, shall allocate to principal any gain or loss realized thereon.

This section does not apply to a bond or other obligation to which section 3359, 3360, 3361, 3362, 3364, or 3365 of this title applies.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Variable or floating interest rates.

The reference in subsection (a) to variable or floating interest rate obligations is intended to clarify that, even though an obligation’s interest rate may change from time to time based upon changes in an index or other market indicator, an obligation to pay money containing a variable or floating rate provision is subject to this section and is not to be treated as a derivative financial instrument under section 3364.

Discount obligations.

Subsection (b) applies to all obligations acquired at a discount, including short-term obligations such as U.S. Treasury Bills, long-term obligations such as U.S. Savings Bonds, zero-coupon bonds, and discount bonds that pay interest during part, but not all, of the period before maturity.
Under subsection (b), the entire increase in value of these obligations is principal when the trustee receives the proceeds from the disposition unless the obligation, when acquired, has a maturity of less than one year.
In order to have one rule that applies to all discount obligations, the Act eliminates the provision in the 1962 Act for the payment from principal of an amount equal to the increase in the value of U.S. Series E bonds.
The provision for bonds that mature within one year after acquisition by the trustee is derived from the Illinois act.
760 ILCS 15/8 (1996).

Subsection (b) also applies to inflation-indexed bonds - any increase in principal due to inflation after issuance is principal upon redemption if the bond matures more than one year after the trustee acquires it; if it matures within one year, all of the increase, including any attributable to an inflation adjustment, is income.

Effect of section 3324.

In deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the power to adjust between principal and income granted by subsection 3324(a), a relevant factor for the trustee to consider is the effect on the portfolio as a whole of having a portion of the assets invested in bonds that do not pay interest currently.

Vermont Comment

Obligation to Pay Money.

The Vermont Act here departs from the Uniform Act entirely and adopts Alabama’s version of this section in full because the Vermont study committee concluded that Alabama’s version provides better guidance with respect to special circumstances.

§ 3357.
Insurance policies and similar contracts.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a trustee shall allocate to principal the proceeds of a life insurance policy or other contract in which the trust or its trustee is named as beneficiary, including a contract that insures the trust or its trustee against loss for damage to, destruction of, or loss of title to a trust asset. The trustee shall allocate dividends on an insurance policy to income if the premiums on the policy are paid from income, and to principal if the premiums are paid from principal.

A trustee shall allocate to income proceeds of a contract that insures the trustee against loss of occupancy or other use by an income beneficiary, loss of income, or, subject to section 3353 of this title, loss of profits from a business.

This section does not apply to a contract to which section 3359 of this title applies.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.